Illinois, session 104th, HB2577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Conservation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1115/1)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 7601)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Energy Conservation Act."9(Source: P.A. 81-357.)